Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 3

Transportation Reporting Act of 2001

54-1-301. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Transportation Reporting Act of 2001.”

Acts 2001, ch. 298, § 2.

54-1-302. Annual report on transportation — Required information.

Beginning June 30, 2001, and every quarter thereafter, the department of transportation shall generate a report to be submitted to the general assembly and the state building commission on the status of all highway and road projects approved by the general assembly as part of the department's budget. The status report shall include a current list of projects being planned, projects under construction, and anticipated starting dates for projects not yet underway.

With respect to each project referenced in subsection (a), the report shall:

State the initial contract price;

Identify the final cost of the project; and

If there is a significant change in cost, state the amount by which the authorized expenditures exceed the initial contract price, as well as the contributing factors for the cost changes.

Acts 2001, ch. 298, § 3.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, § 3-1-114.